Washington statutes.
RCW 10.55.010

Definitions.

"Witness" as used in this chapter shall include a person whose testimony is desired in any proceeding or investigation by a grand jury or in a criminal action, prosecution or proceeding.

The word "state" shall include any territory of the United States and the District of Columbia.

The word "summons" shall include a subpoena, order or other notice requiring the appearance of a witness.

[ 1943 c 218 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2150-1.]